California, session 20252026, AB818.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65946.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:65946.1. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Affected property” means a residential real property that satisfies either of the following conditions:(A) The property was destroyed by a disaster that resulted in a declared local emergency.(B) The property was rendered a substandard building as a result of a disaster that resulted in a declared local emergency.(2) “Disaster” has the same meaning as defined in Section 8680.3.(3) Notwithstanding Section 65930, “local agency” means any city, county, or city and county.(4) “Local emergency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 8680.9.(5) “Substandard building” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17920 of the Health and Safety Code.(6) “Utility provider” means an entity that provides a utility service connection and that is subject to the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 66000).(b) If a local agency approves a permit necessary to rebuild or repair an affected property, a utility provider shall provide a written notice describing the next steps in the approval process for a connection request for the project within 30 days of receipt of the connection request, unless connection is infeasible due to the disaster.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, after a parcel has been deemed safe for development by the state, a local agency, or the state and a local agency after a disaster that resulted in a declared local emergency, a local agency shall approve or deny a complete application, within 10 business days of receipt of the application, for a building permit or an equivalent permit for any of the following structures intended to be used by a person until the rebuilding or repairing of an affected property is complete:(1) A state-approved or federally approved modular home.(2) A state-approved or federally approved prefabricated home.(3) A detached structure that would meet the applicable requirements to be an accessory dwelling unit for the affected property.(d) (1) A local agency shall provide information to the public about the provisions of this section through public information resources, including, but not limited to, on the local agency’s internet website.(2) A local agency shall include all of the following on its internet website:(A) A checklist of the conditions that would result in a residential property being deemed a substandard building.(B) A notice that a person may obtain a confidential third-party code inspection from a licensed contractor to determine the unit’s existing condition or potential scope of building improvements before submitting an application for a permit to rebuild or repair an affected property.(C) For a city, county, or city and county with a population greater than 30,000 residents based on the most recent United States Census Bureau data, a dashboard that tracks permitting timelines and agency performance.(3) A local agency shall comply with this subdivision by March 31, 2028, and shall update the information required to be provided by this subdivision every four years thereafter.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act adding Section 65946.1 to the Government Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.